Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.302

Mobile home, manufactured home.

"Mobile home" or "manufactured home" means a structure, designed and constructed to be transportable in one or more sections, and is built on a permanent chassis, and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities that include plumbing, heating, and electrical systems contained therein. The structure must comply with the national mobile home construction and safety standards act of 1974 as adopted by chapter 43.22 RCW if applicable. Manufactured home does not include a modular home. A structure which met the definition of a "manufactured home" at the time of manufacture is still considered to meet this definition notwithstanding that it is no longer transportable.

[ 1993 c 154 s 1. Prior: 1989 c 343 s 24; 1989 c 337 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 22 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 231 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 343: See RCW 65.20.950.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 22: "If any section or provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the section or provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 22 s 10.]

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 231: See note following RCW 46.01.130.